Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
MEMBERS

7-58-501. Members.

To begin business, a limited cooperative association must have at least two patron members unless the sole member is a cooperative.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 778, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-502. Becoming a member.

A person becomes a member:

As provided in the articles or bylaws;

As the result of a merger or conversion under part 16 of this article; or

With the consent of all the members.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 778, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-503. No power as member to bind association.

A member, solely by reason of being a member, may not act for or bind the limited cooperative association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 779, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-504. No liability as member for association's obligations.

Unless the articles otherwise provide, a debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely that of the association and is not the debt, obligation, or liability of a member solely by reason of being a member.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 779, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-505. Right of member and former member to information.

Not later than ten business days after receipt of a demand made in a record, a limited cooperative association shall permit a member to obtain, inspect, and copy in the association's principal office required information listed in section 7-58-112 (1)(a) to (1)(f) during regular business hours. A member need not have any particular purpose for seeking the information. The association is not required to provide the information listed in section 7-58-112 (1)(b) to (1)(f) to the same member more than once during a six-month period.

On demand made in a record received by the limited cooperative association, a member may obtain, inspect, and copy in the association's principal office required information listed in section 7-58-112 (1)(g), (1)(h), (1)(j), and (1)(o) during regular business hours, if:

The member seeks the information in good faith and for a proper purpose reasonably related to the member's interest;

The demand includes a description, with reasonable particularity, of the information sought and the purpose for seeking the information;

The information sought is directly connected to the member's purpose; and

The demand is otherwise reasonable.

Not later than ten business days after receipt of a demand pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a limited cooperative association shall provide, in a record, the following information to the member that made the demand:

If the association agrees to provide the demanded information:

What information the association will provide in response to the demand; and

A reasonable time and reasonable place at which the association will provide the information; or

If the association declines to provide some or all of the demanded information, the association's reasons for declining.

A person dissociated as a member may obtain, inspect, and copy information available to a member under subsection (1) or (2) of this section by delivering a demand in a record to the limited cooperative association, in the same manner and subject to the same conditions applicable to a member under subsection (2) of this section, if:

The information pertains to the period during which the person was a member in the association; and

The person seeks the information in good faith.

A limited cooperative association shall respond to a demand made pursuant to subsection (4) of this section in the manner provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Not later than ten business days after receipt by a limited cooperative association of a demand made by a member in a record, but not more often than once in a six-month period, the association shall deliver to the member a record stating the information with respect to the member required by section 7-58-112 (1)(n).

A limited cooperative association may impose reasonable restrictions, including nondisclosure restrictions, on the use of information obtained under this section. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection (7), the association has the burden of proving reasonableness.

A limited cooperative association may charge a person that makes a demand under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of equipment, labor, and material.

A person that may obtain information under this section may obtain the information through an attorney or other agent. A restriction imposed on the person under subsection (7) of this section or by the articles or bylaws applies to the attorney or other agent.

The rights stated in this section do not extend to a person as transferee.

The articles or bylaws may require a limited cooperative association to provide more information than required by this section and may establish conditions and procedures for providing the information.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 779, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-506. Annual meeting of members.

Members shall meet annually at a time provided in the articles or bylaws or set by the board of directors not inconsistent with the articles and bylaws.

An annual members meeting may be held inside or outside this state at the place stated in the articles or bylaws or selected by the board of directors not inconsistent with the articles and bylaws.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, members may attend or conduct an annual members meeting through any means of communication if all members attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

The board of directors shall report, or cause to be reported, at the association's annual members meeting the association's business and financial condition as of the close of the most recent fiscal year.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, the board of directors shall designate the presiding officer of the association's annual members meeting.

Failure to hold an annual members meeting does not affect the validity of any action by the limited cooperative association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 780, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-507. Special meeting of members.

A special meeting of members may be called only:

As provided in the articles or bylaws;

By a majority vote of the board of directors on a proposal stating the purpose of the meeting;

By demand in a record signed by members holding at least twenty percent of the voting power of the persons in any district or class entitled to vote on the matter that is the purpose of the meeting stated in the demand; or

By demand in a record signed by members holding at least ten percent of the total voting power of all the persons entitled to vote on the matter that is the purpose of the meeting stated in the demand.

A demand under paragraph (c) or (d) of subsection (1) of this section must be submitted to the officer of the limited cooperative association charged with keeping its records.

Any voting member may withdraw its demand under paragraph (c) or (d) of subsection (1) of this section before receipt by the limited cooperative association of demands sufficient to require a special meeting of members.

A special meeting of members may be held inside or outside this state at the place stated in the articles or bylaws or selected by the board of directors not inconsistent with the articles and bylaws.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, members may attend or conduct a special meeting of members through the use of any means of communication if all members attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

Only business within the purpose or purposes stated in the notice of a special meeting of members may be conducted at the meeting.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, the presiding officer of a special meeting of members shall be designated by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 781, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-508. Notice of members meeting.

A limited cooperative association shall notify each member of the time, date, and place of a members meeting at least ten and not more than sixty days before the meeting; except that, if the notice is of a meeting of the members in one or more districts or classes of members, the notice shall be given only to members in those districts or classes.

Unless this article or the articles otherwise provide, notice of an annual members meeting need not include any purpose of the meeting.

Notice of a special meeting of members shall include each purpose of the meeting as contained in the demand under section 7-58-507 (1)(c) or (1)(d) or as voted upon by the board of directors under section 7-58-507 (1)(b).

Notice of a members meeting shall be given in a record unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, whenever notice is required to be given under this section or under any other provision of this article to any member, such notice shall not be required to be given to a member if:

Notice of two consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between the two consecutive annual meetings, have been sent to the member at the member's address as shown on the records of the limited cooperative association and have been returned undeliverable; or

All, but not less than two, payments of distributions during a twelve-month period, or two consecutive payments of distributions during a period of more than twelve months, have been sent to the member at the member's address as shown on the records of the association and have been returned undeliverable.

If any such member delivers to the association a notice in a record setting forth the member's then-current address, the requirement that notice be given to the member shall be reinstated.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 782, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-509. Waiver of members meeting notice.

A member may waive notice of a members meeting before, during, or after the meeting.

A member's participation in a members meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting unless the member objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the member's arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 782, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-510. Quorum of members.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise require a different number of members or percentage of the voting power, a quorum for conducting business at all meetings of the members consists of five percent of the total number of members or thirty members present at the meeting, whichever is less. Nothing prevents the articles or bylaws from requiring a greater or lesser number or percentage of members, or members of classes, districts, or voting groups as a quorum.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 783, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-511. Voting by patron members.

Except as provided by section 7-58-512 (1), each patron member has one vote. The articles or bylaws may allocate voting power among patron members as provided in section 7-58-512 (1).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 783, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-512. Determination of voting power of patron member.

The articles or bylaws may allocate voting power among patron members on the basis of one or a combination of the following:

One member, one vote;

Use or patronage;

Equity; or

If a patron member is a cooperative, the number of its patron members.

If the articles or bylaws allocate voting power on the basis of use or patronage and a member would be denied a vote because the member did not use the limited cooperative association or conduct patronage with it during the period on which the allocation of voting power is determined, the articles or bylaws must provide that the member shall nevertheless be allocated a vote equal to at least the minimum voting power allocated to members who used the association or conducted patronage with it during the period.

The articles or bylaws may provide for the allocation of patron member voting power by districts or class or any combination thereof.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 783, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-513. Voting by investor members.

If the articles or bylaws provide for investor members, each investor member has one vote unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide. The articles or bylaws may provide for the allocation of investor member voting power by class, classes, or any combination of classes.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 783, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-514. Voting requirements for members.

If a limited cooperative association has both patron and investor members, the following rules apply:

The total voting power of all patron members must not be less than a majority of the entire voting power entitled to vote.

Action on any matter is approved only upon the affirmative vote of at least a majority of:

All members voting at the meeting unless more than a majority is required or permitted by parts 4, 12, 15, and 16 of this article or the articles or bylaws; and

Votes cast by patron members unless the articles or bylaws require a larger affirmative vote by patron members.

The articles or bylaws may provide for the percentage of the affirmative votes that must be cast by investor members to approve the matter.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 784, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-515. Manner of voting.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, voting by a proxy at a members meeting is prohibited. This subsection (1) does not prohibit delegate voting based on district or class.

If voting by a proxy is permitted, a patron member may appoint only another patron member as a proxy and, if investor members are permitted, an investor member may appoint only another investor member as a proxy.

The articles or bylaws may provide for the manner of and provisions governing the appointment of a proxy.

The articles or bylaws may provide for voting on any question by ballot delivered by mail or voting by other means on questions that are subject to vote by members.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 784, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-516. Action without a meeting.

Unless the articles or bylaws require that action be taken at a members meeting, any action required or permitted by this article to be taken at a members meeting may be taken without a meeting if notice of the proposed action is given as provided in subsection (6) of this section, and:

All of the members entitled to vote thereon consent to the action in a record; or

If expressly provided for in the articles, the members holding membership interests having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take the action at a meeting at which all of the membership interests entitled to vote thereon were present and voted consent to the action in a record.

No action taken pursuant to this section is effective unless, within sixty days after the date the limited cooperative association first receives a record describing and consenting to the action and signed by a member, the association has received records that describe and consent to the action, signed by members holding at least the number of votes entitled to be voted on the action as required by subsection (1) of this section, disregarding any record that has been revoked pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The articles or bylaws may provide for the receipt of any record by the association by electronically transmitted facsimile or other form of wire or wireless communication providing the association with a complete copy thereof, including a copy of the signature thereon.

Action taken pursuant to this section is effective as of the date the limited cooperative association receives the last record necessary to effect the action unless all of the records necessary to effect the action state another date as the effective date of the action, in which case the stated date is the effective date of the action.

Any member who has signed a record describing and consenting to action taken pursuant to this section may revoke the consent by a record signed and dated by the member describing the action and stating that the member's prior consent thereto is revoked, if the record is received by the limited cooperative association prior to the effectiveness of the action.

If not otherwise fixed under subsection (7) of this section, the record date for determining members entitled to take action pursuant to this section or entitled to be given notice under subsection (6) of this section of action taken pursuant to this section is the date the limited cooperative association first receives a writing upon which the action is taken pursuant to this section.

Action taken under this section has the same effect as action taken at a members meeting and may be described as such.

If action is to be taken under subsection (1) of this section, the limited cooperative association shall give notice of the proposed action to the members entitled to vote thereon. The notice must:

Be given in a record;

Describe the proposed action; and

Specify the date on or before which consents to be given pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be received by the association.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), whenever notice is required to be given under this subsection (6) to any member, the notice is not required to be given to a member if:

Notice of two consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between the two consecutive annual meetings, have been sent to the member at the member's address as shown on the records of the limited cooperative association and have been returned undeliverable; or

All, but not less than two, payments of distributions during a twelve-month period, or two consecutive payments of distributions during a period of more than twelve months, have been sent to the member at the member's address as shown on the records of the association and have been returned undeliverable.

If any such member delivers to the association a notice in a record setting forth the member's then-current address, the requirement that notice be given to the member is reinstated.

The proper court may, upon application of the association or any member who would be entitled to vote on the action at a members meeting, summarily state a record date for determining members entitled to sign records consenting to an action under this section and may enter other orders necessary or appropriate to effect the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 784, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-517. Districts and delegates - classes of members.

The articles or bylaws may provide for the formation of geographic districts of patron members, the conduct of patron member meetings by districts, the election of directors at the meetings, the election of district delegates to represent and vote for the district at members meetings, or any combination thereof.

A delegate elected under subsection (1) of this section has one vote unless voting power is otherwise allocated by the articles or bylaws.

The articles or bylaws may provide for the establishment of classes of members; the preferences, rights, and limitations of the classes; the conduct of members meetings by classes and the election of directors at the meetings; the election of class delegates to represent and vote for the district at members meetings; or any combination thereof.

A delegate elected under subsection (3) of this section has one vote unless voting power is otherwise allocated by the articles or bylaws.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 786, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.